Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 69.
REPEAL OF AMENDMENT 44 (PROTECTION OF STATES' RIGHTS) (CONST. AMEND. 44, REPEALED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment repealed Ark. Const. Amend. 44. The amendment, effective December 6, 1990, was proposed by H.J.R. 1003 during the 1989 Regular Session and adopted at the Nov. 6, 1990, general election by a vote of 273,527 for and 263,261 against.